Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1794
Participation loans.

A credit union may participate in loans to credit union members jointly with other credit unions, credit union organizations, or other organizations pursuant to written policies established by the board of directors. A credit union which originates such a loan shall retain an interest of at least ten percent of the face amount of the loan.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 94.